Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB893.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3 of the act of October 13, 2010 (P.L.506, No.72), known as the Construction Workplace Misclassification Act, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 3. Independent contractors.* * *(a.1) Contractor registration.--Evidence that an individual is registered as a contractor under the act of October 17, 2008 (P.L.1645, No.132), known as the Home Improvement Consumer Protection Act, at the time the individual performs services in the construction industry shall constitute prima facie evidence that the individual is an independent contractor under 1234567891011121314151617181920 subsection (a).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0893PN1004 - 2 - 123